Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 2A Board of Homeland Security

38-3-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Homeland Security.

“Center” means the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center.

“Critical infrastructure” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-220.

“Domestic terrorism” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-220.

“Public transportation system” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-220.

“Serious bodily harm” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-220.

“State or government facility” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-220.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-4/HB 779.

38-3-41.
Creation; membership; allowances.

There is created a Board of Homeland Security that shall, for administrative purposes only, be attached to the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency.

The board shall consist of 16 members who shall be as follows:

The Governor, ex officio, who shall be chairperson of the board;

The director of emergency management and homeland security;

The director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation;

The commissioner of public safety;

The Attorney General or his or her designee who shall be the deputy attorney general or an assistant attorney general;

The adjutant general;

The commissioner of natural resources;

The commissioner of public health;

The State School Superintendent;

The commissioner of transportation;

The Commissioner of Agriculture;

The executive director of the Georgia Technology Authority; and

Five appointees of the Governor who shall be individuals from the public or private sector who are directly involved in policy, program, security, or funding activities relevant to homeland security or infrastructure protection; provided, however, that one such appointment shall be a sheriff, one such appointment shall be a member of the Senate, one such appointment shall be a member of the House of Representatives, and one such appointment shall be a chief executive of a law enforcement agency of a county or a municipality. Such appointees under this paragraph shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Any legislative members of the board who may be appointed pursuant to paragraph (13) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall receive the allowances provided for in Code Section 28-1-8.

Members of the board who are state or local government officials, other than legislative members, or state or local government employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the board, but they may be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties as members of the board in the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state or local government officials or state or local government employees.

Members of the board who are not legislators, state or local government officials, or state or local government employees shall receive a daily expense allowance in an amount the same as that specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21, as well as the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees.

Funds for the reimbursement of the expenses of state or local government officials, other than legislative members, and state or local government employees shall come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective governments, departments, authorities, or agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-4/HB 779.

38-3-42.
Board’s duty to advise Governor; development of state-wide homeland security strategy; coordination with federal strategic guidance on homeland security; rules and regulations.

The board shall advise the Governor on:

The implementation of the homeland security strategy by state and local agencies and provide specific guidance and counsel for helping those agencies implement the strategy; and

All matters related to the planning, development, coordination, and implementation of initiatives to promote the homeland security strategy of the state.

The board shall develop a state-wide homeland security strategy that improves the state’s ability to:

Protect against, respond to, and recover from domestic terrorism and other homeland security threats and hazards; and

Mitigate loss of life and property by lessening the impact of future homeland security threats and hazards.

The board’s homeland security strategy shall coordinate homeland security activities among and between local, state, and federal agencies and the private sector and shall include specific plans for:

Intelligence gathering, analysis, and sharing;

Reducing the state’s vulnerability to domestic terrorism and other homeland security threats and hazards;

Protecting critical infrastructure, public transportation systems, and state or government facilities;

Protecting the state’s ports and airports;

Detecting, deterring, and defending against domestic terrorism and cyber, biological, chemical, and nuclear terrorism;

Positioning equipment, technology, and personnel to improve the state’s ability to respond to homeland security threats and hazards;

Providing the center certain forms of authority to aid the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency in implementing the homeland security strategy of this state; and

Using technological resources to:

Facilitate the interoperability of governmental technology resources, including data, networks, and applications;

Coordinate the warning and alert systems of state and local agencies;

Incorporate multidisciplinary approaches to homeland security; and

Improve the security of governmental and private sector information technology and information resources.

The homeland security strategy shall complement and operate in coordination with federal strategic guidance on homeland security.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations which shall be adopted, established, promulgated, amended, repealed, filed, and published in accordance with the applicable provisions and procedures set forth in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The courts shall take judicial notice of any such rules or regulations. As used in this subsection, the term “rules and regulations” shall have the same meaning as the word “rule” as defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 50-13-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-4/HB 779.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2018, “a” was deleted following “state’s ability to respond to” in paragraph (c)(6).